Maryland, session 2025, SB0866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–207.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE;
(II) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(3) “GOVERNING BODY” MEANS:
(I) THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OF A CONDOMINIUM;
(II) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION;
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, OR
ANY OTHER ENTITY ESTABLISHED TO GOVERN A PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN
INSTRUMENT THAT IMPOSES ON LOTS, OR ON THE OWNERS OR OCCUPANTS OF LOTS,
ANY MANDATORY FEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SERVICES OR
OTHERWISE FOR THE BENEFIT OF SOME OR ALL OF THE LOTS; OR
(IV) ANY OTHER BODY AUTHORIZED TO ADOPT RULES OR
REGULATIONS GOVERNING A CONDOMINIUM, COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION, OR HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(4) “GOVERNING DOCUMENTS” MEANS ANY BYLAW, COVENANT,
DECLARATION, RULE, PROPRIETARY LEASE, OR OTHER SIMILAR DOCUMENT OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.

SENATE BILL 866 3
(5) “LOCAL COMMISSION” MEANS A COMMISSION ON COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
11C–101 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(6) “MEMBER” MEANS:
(I) AN OCCUPANT OR A UNIT OWNER UNDER THE MARYLAND
CONDOMINIUM ACT;
(II) A LOT OWNER UNDER THE MARYLAND HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION ACT; OR
(III) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS
DEFINED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(7) “UNIT” MEANS THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
OMBUDSMAN UNIT IN THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) THERE IS A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN UNIT IN
THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE UNIT IS:
(1) TO MONITOR CHANGES IN FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS RELATING
TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(2) TO PUBLISH INFORMATION CONCERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES ON THE WEBSITE OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(3) TO ASSIST MEMBERS IN UNDERSTANDING RIGHTS AND
PROCESSES AVAILABLE TO MEMBERS UNDER LAWS AND REGULATIONS GOVERNING
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES; AND
(4) ON REQUEST, TO PROVIDE REFERRALS TO PUBLIC AND PRIVATE
ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION SERVICES, WITH A GOAL OF REDUCING AND
RESOLVING CONFLICTS AMONG GOVERNING BODIES AND MEMBERS.
(D) THE UNIT SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A FULL–TIME COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN;
AND
(2) STAFF AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.

SENATE BILL 866
(E) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL APPOINT THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN.
(2) THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OMBUDSMAN MUST BE A
MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND BAR.
(F) THE UNIT SHALL RECEIVE AND RESPOND TO COMPLAINTS BY MEMBERS
REGARDING FINAL ADVERSE DECISIONS BY A GOVERNING BODY OR COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(G) IN RESPONSE TO A COMPLAINT, OR ON THE INITIATIVE OF THE
OMBUDSMAN, THE UNIT SHALL:
(1) REFER THE COMPLAINT TO AN APPROPRIATE LOCAL COMMISSION
FOR FURTHER REVIEW OF WHETHER THE FINAL ADVERSE DECISION CONFLICTS
WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN
THE JURISDICTION; OR
(2) MAKE A DETERMINATION OF WHETHER THE FINAL ADVERSE
DECISION CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES AND PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE COMPLAINANT OF THE
DETERMINATION.
(H) (1) IF THE UNIT DETERMINES THAT A FINAL ADVERSE DECISION
CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES, THE UNIT SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE MEMBER, THE GOVERNING
BOARD, AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER
THAT THE ADVERSE DECISION CONFLICTS WITH LAWS OR REGULATIONS
GOVERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
(2) IF WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER ISSUING A DETERMINATION, THE
OMBUDSMAN RECEIVES A SUBSEQUENT COMPLAINT OF A FINAL ADVERSE DECISION
FOR THE SAME VIOLATION, THE UNIT SHALL REFER THE MATTER TO THE
APPROPRIATE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(I) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE UNIT SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
UNIT DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.

SENATE BILL 866 5
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF COMPLAINTS RECEIVED BY THE UNIT;
(II) THE TYPES OF ASSISTANCE REQUESTED;
(III) ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE UNIT;
(IV) THE NUMBER OF REFERRALS MADE TO LOCAL
COMMISSIONS; AND
(V) DATA ON DISPOSITIONS AND OUTCOMES OF COMPLAINTS
RECEIVED.
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–304.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 2–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “GOVERNING DOCUMENTS” MEANS AN OFFERING STATEMENT, A
DECLARATION, BYLAWS, RULES, REGULATIONS, A PROPRIETARY LEASE, OR ANY
OTHER SIMILAR DOCUMENT OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) (1) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY LOCATED IN THE STATE
SHALL FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT A COPY OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, AND
ANY AMENDMENTS TO THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(2) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THAT FAILS TO MAKE A
FILING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE OF $500.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A DATABASE
OF GOVERNING DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE DESCRIBED IN § 2–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 866
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE THE FOLLOWING FEES FOR
FILINGS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR AN INITIAL FILING, UP TO $100; AND
(II) FOR ANY AMENDMENT TO A GOVERNING DOCUMENT, UP TO
$25.
Article – Real Property
TITLE 11C. LOCAL COMMISSIONS ON COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
11C–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMON ELEMENT” MEANS:
(1) ANY PORTION OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OTHER
THAN THE UNITS OF A CONDOMINIUM OR COOPERATIVE; AND
(2) PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED OR LEASED BY A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION.
(C) (1) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE
THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES;
(II) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE; AND
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
TIME–SHARE PROJECT AS DEFINED IN § 11A–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) (1) “DISPUTE” MEANS A DISAGREEMENT BETWEEN AT LEAST TWO
PARTIES THAT INVOLVES:

SENATE BILL 866 7
(I) THE AUTHORITY OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY TO:
1. REQUIRE OR PROHIBIT ANY ACTION INVOLVING A
UNIT OR COMMON ELEMENT;
2. REQUIRE ANY PERSON TO PAY A FEE, A FINE, OR AN
ASSESSMENT;
3. SPEND COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY FUNDS; OR
4. ALTER OR ADD TO A COMMON ELEMENT; OR
(II) THE FAILURE OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY TO:
1. PROPERLY CONDUCT AN ELECTION;
2. GIVE ADEQUATE NOTICE OF A MEETING OR AN OTHER
ACTION;
3. PROPERLY CONDUCT A MEETING;
4. PROPERLY ADOPT A BUDGET OR RULES;
5. MAINTAIN OR AUDIT BOOKS AND RECORDS;
6. ALLOW INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND RECORDS;
7. MAINTAIN OR REPAIR A COMMON ELEMENT IF THE
FAILURE RESULTS IN SIGNIFICANT PERSONAL INJURY OR PROPERTY DAMAGE; OR
8. EXERCISE ITS JUDGMENT IN GOOD FAITH
CONCERNING THE ENFORCEMENT OF THE ASSOCIATION DOCUMENTS AGAINST ANY
PERSON THAT IS SUBJECT TO THOSE DOCUMENTS.
(2) “DISPUTE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DISAGREEMENT THAT
INVOLVES:
(I) TITLE TO ANY UNIT OR COMMON ELEMENT;
(II) THE PERCENTAGE INTEREST OR VOTE ALLOCABLE TO A
UNIT;

SENATE BILL 866
(III) THE INTERPRETATION OR ENFORCEMENT OF ANY
WARRANTY;
(IV) THE COLLECTION OF AN ASSESSMENT VALIDLY LEVIED
AGAINST A PARTY; OR
(V) THE EXERCISE OF THE JUDGMENT OR DISCRETION OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY REGARDING ANY LEGALLY AUTHORIZED ACTION.
(E) “GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(1) THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OF A CONDOMINIUM;
(2) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION;
(3) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, OR AN
OTHER ENTITY ESTABLISHED TO GOVERN A PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN INSTRUMENT
THAT IMPOSES ON LOTS, OR ON THE OWNERS OR OCCUPANTS OF LOTS, ANY
MANDATORY FEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SERVICES OR
OTHERWISE FOR THE BENEFIT OF SOME OR ALL OF THE LOTS; OR
(4) ANY OTHER BODY AUTHORIZED TO ADOPT RULES OR
REGULATIONS GOVERNING A CONDOMINIUM, COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION, OR HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(F) (1) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” MEANS:
(I) THE MASTER DEED, DECLARATION, INCORPORATION
DOCUMENT, BYLAWS, OR RULES OF ANY COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(II) A WRITTEN PRIVATE AGREEMENT BETWEEN PARTIES
CONCERNING THE OPERATION OF THE COMMUNITY OR MAINTENANCE OR CONTROL
OF COMMON OR LIMITED COMMON PROPERTY; OR
(III) A DOCUMENT CONCERNING THE OPERATION OR
GOVERNANCE OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(2) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A LEASE UNLESS
THE LEASE PROVIDES THAT IT MAY BE ENFORCED UNDER THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 866 9
(G) “LOCAL COMMISSION” MEANS A COMMISSION ON COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(H) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS:
(1) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OR COUNTY COUNCIL OF A
COUNTY;
(2) IF THE CHARTER OF THE COUNTY PROVIDES FOR A COUNTY
EXECUTIVE, THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND THE COUNTY COUNCIL; OR
(3) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(I) “OWNER” MEANS:
(1) A UNIT OWNER IN A CONDOMINIUM;
(2) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION; OR
(3) A LOT OWNER IN A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
11C–102.
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE SUPERSEDE ANY INCONSISTENT PROVISIONS
OF LOCAL LAW THAT CONFLICT WITH THIS TITLE TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
11C–103.
(A) A LOCAL COMMISSION ON COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES
ESTABLISHED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OF A COUNTY BY LOCAL LAW SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE MEMBERS WHO:
1. ARE OWNERS IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
AND
2. REPRESENT PROFESSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS INVOLVED IN
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT OR REAL ESTATE SALES, DEVELOPERS, OR ATTORNEYS
WHO REPRESENT COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES INCLUDING AT LEAST ONE
MEMBER WHO IS A LICENSED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER.

SENATE BILL 866
(II) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL DETERMINE THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS SHALL SERVE AS NONVOTING
MEMBERS OF A LOCAL COMMISSION:
(I) A DESIGNEE OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT; AND
(II) A DESIGNEE OF A COUNTY AGENCY DEALING WITH:
1. PLANNING;
2. ENVIRONMENT;
3. PERMITTING;
4. TRANSPORTATION; OR
5. HOUSING AND COMMUNITY AFFAIRS.
(C) THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL BE
ELECTED FROM AMONG THE VOTING MEMBERSHIP OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ESTABLISHING A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES
FOR THE APPOINTMENT AND TERMS OF MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) A MEMBER OF A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN
TWO CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
11C–104.
(A) A MAJORITY OF THE TOTAL MEMBERSHIP OF A LOCAL COMMISSION
SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM.
(B) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST MONTHLY AND
DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF ITS MEETINGS.
(C) A MEMBER OF A LOCAL COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION; BUT

SENATE BILL 866 11
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD COUNTY TRAVEL REGULATIONS.
(D) (1) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) ADOPT RULES OF PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT AS
APPROPRIATE FOR MEMBERS AND STAFF;
(II) KEEP A RECORD OF ITS PROCEEDINGS;
(III) EXAMINE THE NEEDS OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY;
(IV) ADVISE COUNTY GOVERNMENT AND APPROPRIATE STATE
AND FEDERAL AGENCIES ON MATTERS RELATING TO COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES; AND
(V) PROVIDE TRAINING ON THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF A LOCAL
COMMISSION’S MEMBERS TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY BY:
1. DEVELOPING AN EDUCATIONAL CURRICULUM FOR
NEW MEMBERS; AND
2. APPROVING AN ALTERNATIVE EDUCATIONAL
CURRICULUM FOR NEW MEMBERS.
(2) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY:
(I) EMPLOY STAFF AS AUTHORIZED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(II) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR RESOLVING DISCIPLINARY
MATTERS PENDING BEFORE THE LOCAL COMMISSION THROUGH NONJUDICIAL
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESSES;
(III) DEVELOP EDUCATIONAL AND TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES
FOR GOVERNING BODIES;
(IV) ADOPT ADDITIONAL BYLAWS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE BUSINESS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION; AND

SENATE BILL 866
(V) ADOPT ANY ADDITIONAL REGULATIONS, PROCEDURES, OR
STANDARDS CONSISTENT WITH THE MISSION OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION AND TO
CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE.
11C–105.
(A) A LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY TO REGISTER WITH THE LOCAL
COMMISSION ANNUALLY ON A FORM THAT IDENTIFIES:
(1) THE ELECTED LEADERSHIP OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY; AND
(2) THE MANAGING AGENTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(B) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THAT FAILS TO REGISTER OR
MAKES A FALSE STATEMENT ON A REGISTRATION FORM IS INELIGIBLE TO FILE A
DISPUTE.
11C–106.
(A) A LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE
THE COLLECTION OF A REASONABLE FEE FOR SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL
COMMISSION.
(B) ANY AUTHORIZED FEE SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE COST OF
MAINTAINING THE LOCAL COMMISSION AND MAY INCLUDE:
(1) A PER UNIT ANNUAL CHARGE TO COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES TO RENEW REGISTRATION;
(2) FEES FOR DISPUTE RESOLUTION UNDER § 11C–110 OF THIS
TITLE, SERVICE, AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE; AND
(3) A PER UNIT CHARGE TO DEVELOPERS FOR THE RECORDATION OF
DOCUMENTS.
(C) IF THE COLLECTION OF A FEE BY A LOCAL COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PUBLISH THE FEE
SCHEDULE.
11C–107.

SENATE BILL 866 13
A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT ESTABLISHES A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL
DESIGNATE A COUNTY AGENCY OR AN OFFICE TO:
(1) DISSEMINATE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS REGARDING PROGRAMS
THAT ASSIST COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(2) CONDUCT EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS TO PROMOTE THE
OPERATION OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(3) MAINTAIN A LIST OF:
(I) COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY,
INCLUDING THE LEADERSHIP OF EACH COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(II) PROFESSIONAL MANAGEMENT COMPANIES THAT PROVIDE
SERVICES TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY;
(4) MAINTAIN INFORMATION AND A REFERRAL SYSTEM FOR ALL
COUNTY SERVICES RELATED TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(5) MAINTAIN A COLLECTION OF GOVERNING DOCUMENTS;
(6) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO GOVERNING BODIES ON
MATTERS INCLUDING:
(I) LEADERSHIP TRANSITION;
(II) ELECTIONS;
(III) ADOPTION OF RULES;
(IV) ENFORCEMENT OF RULES;
(V) SELECTION OF ASSOCIATION MANAGERS; AND
(VI) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT;
(7) MAINTAIN AN OPERATIONS MANUAL TO GUIDE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY LEADERSHIP;

SENATE BILL 866
(8) ADVISE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES AND PROFESSIONAL
ASSOCIATION MANAGERS OF CHANGES IN THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS THAT
AFFECT THEIR COMMUNITIES OR OPERATIONS; AND
(9) OPERATE A DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS TO FURNISH
MEDIATION AND ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
11C–108.
(A) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY HEAR ANY DISPUTE BETWEEN PARTIES.
(B) A PARTY MAY NOT FILE A DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL COMMISSION UNTIL:
(1) THE PARTY HAS MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO EXHAUST ALL
PROCEDURES AND REMEDIES PROVIDED BY THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(2) AT LEAST 60 DAYS AFTER ANY PROCEDURE OR REMEDY HAS BEEN
INITIATED WITH THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(C) (1) IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
DETERMINES THAT A DISPUTE EXISTS, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL NOTIFY THE OTHER PARTIES OF THE OPTION TO
FILE THE DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
MAY NOT TAKE ACTION TO ENFORCE OR IMPLEMENT THE DECISION OF THE
GOVERNING BODY FOR 14 DAYS FOLLOWING NOTIFICATION OF ALL OTHER PARTIES.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 11C–109 OF THIS TITLE, ON THE FILING OF
A DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL COMMISSION, THE DECISION OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF
A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL BE STAYED AND MAY NOT BE ENFORCED
OR IMPLEMENTED, OTHER THAN BY FILING A CIVIL ACTION, UNTIL THE
COMPLETION OF THE DISPUTE PROCESS.
11C–109.
(A) (1) AT ANY TIME AFTER A DISPUTE IS FILED, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO LIFT AN
AUTOMATIC STAY UNDER § 11C–108 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 866 15
(2) IF A HEARING PANEL HAS NOT BEEN APPOINTED UNDER §
11C–112 OF THIS TITLE, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL AUTHORIZE A SPECIAL
STANDING PANEL TO CONSIDER REQUESTS FOR RELIEF FROM STAYS.
(3) THE SPECIAL PANEL SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THREE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION
DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED UNDER §
11C–103(B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS TITLE AND AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED UNDER §
11C–103(B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
THAT REQUESTS RELIEF FROM A STAY SHALL SERVE A COPY OF ITS REQUEST ON ANY
PARTY NAMED IN THE DISPUTE BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR PERSONAL SERVICE.
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE SHALL ACCOMPANY ANY REQUEST
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) A PARTY SERVED WITH A COPY OF THE REQUEST SHALL FILE ANY
OPPOSITION TO THE REQUEST WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING SERVICE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A REQUEST
FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY MAY BE GRANTED ONLY IF THE ASSIGNED PANEL FINDS
THAT:
(1) ENFORCING THE STAY WOULD RESULT IN UNDUE HARM TO THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(2) LIFTING THE STAY WILL NOT RESULT IN UNDUE HARM TO THE
RIGHTS OR INTERESTS OF ANY OPPOSING PARTY.
(D) IF A REQUEST FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY STATING FACTS SUFFICIENT TO
SHOW A NEED FOR IMMEDIATE ACTION IS NOT GRANTED OR DENIED WITHIN 20 DAYS
AFTER THE REQUEST WAS FILED, THE REQUEST SHALL BE DEEMED GRANTED.
11C–110.
(A) (1) FOLLOWING THE FILING OF A DISPUTE WITH A LOCAL
COMMISSION, AN AGENCY DESIGNATED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNDER §
11C–107 OF THIS TITLE MAY INVESTIGATE FACTS AND ASSEMBLE DOCUMENTS

SENATE BILL 866
RELEVANT TO THE DISPUTE AND MAY PREPARE A SUMMARY OF THE ISSUES IN THE
DISPUTE FOR USE BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE MAY NOTIFY A PARTY IF
THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE FINDS THAT A DISPUTE WAS NOT PROPERLY
FILED.
(3) THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE MAY NOTIFY EACH PARTY
OF THE DISPUTE REGARDING POSSIBLE SANCTIONS UNDER § 11C–112 OF THIS
TITLE.
(B) IF THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE FINDS THAT, ASSUMING ALL
FACTS ALLEGED BY THE PARTY THAT FILED THE DISPUTE ARE TRUE, THERE ARE NO
REASONABLE GROUNDS TO CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR
ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT HAS OCCURRED, THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE
SHALL INFORM THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF THE RESULTS OF AN INVESTIGATION BY A DESIGNATED
AGENCY OR OFFICE, A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY:
(1) IF IT FINDS THAT THERE ARE NO REASONABLE GROUNDS TO
CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT
HAS OCCURRED, DISMISS THE DISPUTE;
(2) REQUEST ADDITIONAL INVESTIGATION BY THE DESIGNATED
AGENCY OR OFFICE; OR
(3) SCHEDULE A HEARING ON THE DISPUTE.
(D) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY RECONSIDER THE DISMISSAL OF A DISPUTE
IF ANY PARTY FILES A MOTION TO RECONSIDER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
DISPUTE IS DISMISSED, DEMONSTRATING THAT:
(1) THE COMMISSION ERRONEOUSLY INTERPRETED OR APPLIED
APPLICABLE LAW OR AN ASSOCIATION DOCUMENT; OR
(2) MATERIAL ISSUES OF FACT THAT ARE NECESSARY TO A FAIR
RESOLUTION OF THE DISPUTE REMAIN UNRESOLVED.
11C–111.
(A) (1) ANY PARTY IN A DISPUTE MAY REQUEST MEDIATION.

SENATE BILL 866 17
(2) IF A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION, THE LOCAL COMMISSION
SHALL NOTIFY ALL PARTIES OF THE REQUEST AND OF THE MEDIATION SESSION.
(3) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A QUALIFIED MEDIATOR
TO MEET WITH THE PARTIES WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION
TO ATTEMPT TO SETTLE THE DISPUTE.
(B) IF A PARTY REFUSES TO ATTEND A MEDIATION SESSION, OR IF
MEDIATION DOES NOT SUCCESSFULLY RESOLVE THE DISPUTE WITHIN 10 DAYS
AFTER THE FIRST MEDIATION SESSION IS HELD, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL
PROMPTLY SCHEDULE A HEARING.
11C–112.
(A) (1) IF A HEARING IS SCHEDULED, THE CHAIR OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE A PANEL TO HEAR THE DISPUTE.
(2) THE CHAIR SHALL SELECT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED
UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS TITLE AND AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED
UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MEMBERS SELECTED BY THE CHAIR
SHALL DESIGNATE A THIRD MEMBER OF THE PANEL FROM A LIST OF VOLUNTEER
ARBITRATORS TRAINED OR EXPERIENCED IN COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
ISSUES MAINTAINED BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(4) IF A SUITABLE ARBITRATOR IS NOT AVAILABLE, THE CHAIR OF
THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL DESIGNATE:
(I) A THIRD PANELIST FROM AMONG THE VOTING MEMBERS OF
THE LOCAL COMMISSION; AND
(II) THE CHAIR OF THE PANEL.
(B) A PANELIST MAY NOT HAVE AN INTEREST IN THE DISPUTE TO BE HEARD.
(C) A HEARING PANEL SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON EACH DISPUTE THAT IS
NOT RESOLVED THROUGH MEDIATION UNDER § 11C–111 OF THIS TITLE UNLESS THE
LOCAL COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE DISPUTE IS:
(1) IDENTICAL TO ANOTHER DISPUTE BETWEEN THE SAME PARTIES
ON WHICH A HEARING HAS ALREADY BEEN HELD UNDER THIS SECTION; OR

SENATE BILL 866
(2) CLEARLY NOT WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION.
(D) A LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF A HEARING TO ALL
PARTIES NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS BEFORE A HEARING, UNLESS THE LOCAL
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT AN EXPEDITED HEARING IS NECESSARY, IN WHICH
CASE NOTICE SHALL BE PROVIDED TO ALL PARTIES AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE A
HEARING.
(E) A PARTY OR WITNESS MAY BE ADVISED BY COUNSEL AT A HEARING.
(F) IF A PARTY, AFTER PROPER NOTICE, DOES NOT APPEAR AT THE
SCHEDULED HEARING, THE HEARING PANEL MAY ORDER ANY RELIEF FOR ANOTHER
PARTY THAT THE FACTS ON RECORD WARRANT.
(G) (1) THE HEARING PANEL SHALL APPLY STATE AND COUNTY LAWS
AND ALL RELEVANT CASE LAW TO THE FACTS OF THE DISPUTE.
(2) A DECISION OF THE HEARING PANEL IS BINDING ON THE PARTIES.
(H) (1) A LOCAL COMMISSION MAY ENFORCE A DECISION OF THE
HEARING PANEL BY APPROPRIATE LEGAL ACTION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ENFORCEMENT ACTION, A LOCAL
COMMISSION MAY:
(I) FILE FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO ENFORCE OR CORRECT
ANY VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) FILE TO RECOVER DAMAGES FOR A LOSS SUSTAINED AS A
RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE.
(I) A HEARING PANEL MAY AWARD COSTS, INCLUDING REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES, TO ANY PARTY IF ANY OTHER PARTY:
(1) FILED OR MAINTAINED A FRIVOLOUS DISPUTE, OR FILED OR
MAINTAINED A DISPUTE IN BAD FAITH;
(2) REFUSED TO PARTICIPATE IN MEDIATION OF A DISPUTE; OR
(3) SUBSTANTIALLY DELAYED OR HINDERED THE DISPUTE
RESOLUTION PROCESS WITHOUT GOOD CAUSE.

SENATE BILL 866 19
(J) A HEARING PANEL MAY REQUIRE A LOSING PARTY IN A DISPUTE TO PAY
ALL OR PART OF ANY FILING FEE.
(K) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY:
(1) ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL HEARING PROCEDURES; AND
(2) ADOPT ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO WITNESSES
AND EVIDENCE FOR A HEARING.
11C–113.
(A) A PARTY MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A HEARING PANEL TO A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(B) AN APPEAL OF A DECISION SHALL BE CONSOLIDATED WITH ANY CASE
THAT ARISES OUT OF THE SAME FACTS.
(C) THE COURT HEARING AN APPEAL SHALL SUSTAIN THE DECISION OF THE
HEARING PANEL UNLESS THE DECISION IS:
(1) INCONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE LAW;
(2) LACKING SUBSTANTIAL EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ARBITRARY AND CAPRICIOUS.
11C–114.
(A) A PARTY MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION ARISING OUT OF A GOVERNING
DOCUMENT OR A LAW REGULATING THE POWERS OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) IF THE COURT IS NOTIFIED THAT A DISPUTE HAS BEEN FILED WITH A
LOCAL COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE, THE COURT MAY POSTPONE
A PROCEEDING FOR AT LEAST 90 DAYS.
(C) THE COURT MAY HEAR THE ACTION DE NOVO IF A HEARING PANEL
ASSIGNED TO THE DISPUTE HAS NOT ISSUED A DECISION UNDER § 11C–112 OF THIS
TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.